ko: 브랜디 등급 분류: 엑스트라; 오르다주; 나폴레옹; 리저브; VO; VS; VSOP; XO; XXO; 기타
en: Brandy age classification: Extra; Hors d'Âge; Napoléon; Réserve; VO; VS; VSOP; XO; XXO; Other
it: Classificazione dell'invecchiamento del brandy: Extra; Hors d’Âge; Napoléon; Réserve; VO; VS; VSOP; XO; XXO; Altro
pt-PT: Classificação do brandy por idade: Extra; Hors d'Âge; Napoléon; Réserve; VO; VS; VSOP; XO; XXO; Outro
el: Κατηγοριοποίηση παλαίωσης μπράντι: Extra; Hors d'Âge; Napoléon; Réserve; VO; VS; VSOP; XO; XXO; Άλλο
lt-LT: Brendžio brandinimo metų klasifikacija: Extra; Hors d'Âge; Napoléon; Réserve; VO; VS; VSOP; XO; XXO; Kita
zh-CN: 白兰地年份分类: Extra; Hors d'Âge; Napoléon; Réserve; VO; VS; VSOP; XO; XXO; 其他
vi: Phân loại độ tuổi rượu Brandy: Extra; Hors d'Âge; Napoléon; Réserve; VO; VS; VSOP; XO; XXO; Khác
hu: Brandy korosztály-besorolása: Extra; Hors d'Âge; Napoléon; Réserve; VO; VS; VSOP; XO; XXO; Egyéb
es: Clasificación de estacionamiento de brandy: Extra; Hors d'âge; Napoleón; Réserve; VO; VS; VSOP; XO; XXO; Otro
da: Aldersklassificering for brændevin: Extra; Hors d'Âge; Napoléon; Réserve; VO; VS; VSOP; XO; XXO; Andet
cs: Klasifikace brandy podle stáří: Extra; Hors d'Âge; Napoléon; Réserve; VO; VS; VSOP; XO; XXO; Jiné
hr-HR: Starosna klasifikacija brendija: Extra; Hors d'Âge; Napoléon; Réserve; VO; VS; VSOP; XO; XXO; Ostalo
de: Brandy-Altersklassfizierung: Extra; Hors d'Âge; Napoléon; Réserve; VO; VS; VSOP; XO; XXO; Sonstige
zh-TW: 白蘭地年份分類: Extra; Hors d'Âge; Napoléon; Réserve; VO; VS; VSOP; XO; XXO; 其他
pt-BR: Classificação etária do conhaque: Extra; Hors d'Âge; Napoléon; Réserve; VO; VS; VSOP; XO; XXO; Outro
nb: Aldersklassifisering for brandy: Extra; Hors d'Âge; Napoléon; Réserve; VO; VS; VSOP; XO; XXO; Annet
bg-BG: Класификация по възраст на бренди: Екстра; Hors d'Âge; Napoléon; Réserve; VO; VS; VSOP; XO; XXO; Други
ja: ブランデー年数分類: エクストラ; オールダージュ; ナポレオン; レゼルヴ; VO; VS; VSOP; XO; XXO; その他
sk-SK: Klasifikácia veku Brandy: Extra; Hors d'Âge; Napoléon; Réserve; VO; VS; VSOP; XO; XXO; Iná
ru: Классификация выдержки бренди: Extra; Hors d'Âge; Napoléon; Réserve; VO; VS; VSOP; XO; XXO; Другое
sl-SI: Klasifikacije starosti žganja: Extra; Hors d'Âge; Napoléon; Réserve; VO; VS; VSOP; XO; XXO; Drugo
fi: Brandyn ikäluokitus: Extra; Hors d'Âge; Napoléon; Réserve; VO; VS; VSOP; XO; XXO; Muu
sv: Ålderklassificering för brandy: Extra; Hors d'Âge; Napoléon; Réserve; VO; VS; VSOP; XO; XXO; Övrigt
tr: Brendi yaş sınıflandırması: Ekstra; Hors d'Âge; Napoléon; Réserve; VO; VS; VSOP; XO; XXO; Diğer
th: การจำแนกอายุของบรั่นดี: Extra; Hors d'Âge; Napoléon; Réserve; VO; VS; VSOP; XO; XXO; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Clasificarea pe vârstă a brandyului: Extra; Hors d'Âge; Napoléon; Réserve; VO; VS; VSOP; XO; XXO; Altele
fr: Classification des brandies en fonction de leur âge: Extra; Hors d'Âge; Napoléon; Réserve; VO; VS; VSOP; XO; XXO; Autre
pl: Klasyfikacja rocznika Brandy: Extra; Hors d'Âge; Napoléon; Réserve; VO; VS; VSOP; XO; XXO; Inne
nl: Leeftijdsklasse brandy: Extra; Hors d'Âge; Napoléon; Réserve; VO; VS; VSOP; XO; XXO; Overig